Ohio, session 136, HB955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 323.151, 323.152, 4503.064, and 4503.065 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 323.151. As used in sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code: (A)(1) "Homestead" means either of the following: (a) A dwelling, including a unit in a multiple-unit dwelling and a manufactured home or mobile home taxed as real property pursuant to division (B) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code, owned and occupied as a home by an individual whose domicile is in this state and who has not acquired ownership from a person, other than the individual's spouse, related by consanguinity or affinity for the purpose of qualifying for the real property tax reduction provided in section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (b) A unit in a housing cooperative that is occupied as a home, but not owned, by an individual whose domicile is in this state. (2) The homestead shall include so much of the land surrounding it, not exceeding one acre, as is reasonably necessary for the use of the dwelling or unit as a home. An owner includes a holder of one of the several estates in fee, a vendee in possession under a purchase agreement or a land contract, a mortgagor, a life tenant, one or more tenants with a right of survivorship, tenants in common, and a settlor of a revocable or irrevocable inter vivos trust holding the title to a homestead occupied by the settlor as of right under the trust. The tax commissioner shall adopt rules for the uniform classification and valuation of real property or portions of real property as homesteads. (B) "Sixty-five years of age or older" means a person who has attained age sixty-four prior to the first day of January of the year of application for reduction in real estate taxes. (C) "Total income" means modified adjusted gross income, as that term is defined in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code, of the owner and the owner's spouse for the year preceding the year in which application for a reduction in taxes is made. (D) "Permanently and totally disabled" means that a person other than a disabled veteran has, on the first day of January of the year of application for reduction in real estate taxes, some impairment in body or mind that makes the person unable to work at any substantially remunerative employment that the person is reasonably able to perform and that will, with reasonable probability, continue for an indefinite period of at least twelve months without any present indication of recovery therefrom or has been certified as permanently and totally disabled by a state or federal agency having the function of so classifying persons. (E) "Housing cooperative" means a housing complex of at least two units that is owned and operated by a nonprofit corporation that issues a share of the corporation's stock to an individual, entitling the individual to live in a unit of the complex, and collects a monthly maintenance fee from the individual to maintain, operate, and pay the taxes of the complex. (F) "Disabled veteran" means a person who is a veteran of the armed forces of the United States, including reserve components thereof, or of the national guard, who has been discharged or released from active duty in the armed forces under honorable conditions, and who has received a total disability rating or a total disability rating for compensation based on individual unemployability for a service-connected disability or combination of service-connected disabilities as prescribed in Title 38, Part 4 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended. (G) "Public service officer" means a peace officer, firefighter, first responder, EMT-basic, EMT-I, or paramedic, or an individual holding any equivalent position in another state. (H) "Killed in the line of duty" means either of the following: (1) Death in the line of duty; (2) Death from injury sustained in the line of duty, including heart attack or other fatal injury or illness caused while in the line of duty. (I) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (J) "Firefighter" means a firefighter, whether paid or volunteer, of a lawfully constituted fire department. (K) "First responder," "EMT-basic," "EMT-I," and "paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (L) "Surviving spouse of a disabled veteran" means either of the following: (1) The spouse of a disabled veteran who occupied the homestead when the disabled veteran died and who acquires ownership of the homestead or, in the case of a homestead that is a unit in a housing cooperative, continues to occupy the homestead; (2) The surviving spouse of an individual to which all of the following apply, provided the surviving spouse occupies the homestead when that individual dies and who, following that individual's death, acquires ownership of the homestead or, in the case of a homestead that is a unit in a housing cooperative, continues to occupy the homestead: (a) The individual dies before receiving a total disability rating described in division (F) of this section. (b) The individual otherwise qualifies as a disabled veteran. (c) The individual owns and occupies a homestead or, in the case of a homestead that is a unit in a housing cooperative, occupies the homestead. Sec. 323.152. In addition to the reduction in taxes required under sections 319.302, 319.303, and 319.304 of the Revised Code, taxes shall be reduced as provided in divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (A)(1)(a) Division (A)(1) of this section applies to any of the following persons: (i) A person who is permanently and totally disabled; (ii) A person who is sixty-five years of age or older; (iii) A person who is the surviving spouse of a deceased person who was permanently and totally disabled or sixty-five years of age or older and who applied and qualified for a reduction in taxes under this division in the year of death, provided the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine but not sixty-five or more years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies. (b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a person to whom division (A)(1) of this section applies shall be reduced for each year for which an application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal one of the following amounts, as applicable to the person: (i) If the person received a reduction under division (A)(1) of this section for tax year 2006, the greater of the reduction for that tax year or the amount computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section; (ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a reduction under division (A)(1) of this section for tax year 2013 or under division (A) of section 4503.065 of the Revised Code for tax year 2014 or the person is the surviving spouse of such a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section. (iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(1)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this section, the amount computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section. (c) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(1)(c) of this section equals the product of the following: (i) Twenty-five thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this section; (ii) The assessment percentage established by the tax commissioner under division (B) of section 5715.01 of the Revised Code, not to exceed thirty-five per cent; (iii) The effective tax rate used to calculate the taxes charged against the property for the current year, where "effective tax rate" is defined as in section 323.08 of the Revised Code; (iv) The quantity equal to one minus the sum of the percentage reductions in taxes received by the property for the current tax year under sections 319.302 and 319.303 of the Revised Code and division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (d) The tax commissioner shall adjust the total income threshold described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) and the reduction amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(i), (A)(2), and (A)(3) of this section by completing the following calculations in September of each year: (i) Determine the percentage increase in the gross domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic analysis of the United States department of commerce from the first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last day of December of the preceding calendar year; (ii) Multiply that percentage increase by the total income threshold or reduction amount for the current tax year, as applicable; (iii) Add the resulting product to the total income threshold or the reduction amount, as applicable, for the current tax year; (iv) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars. The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first day of December each year. The certified total income threshold amount applies to the following tax year for persons described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. The certified reduction amount applies to the following tax year. The commissioner shall not make the applicable adjustment in any calendar year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be less than the total income threshold or the reduction amount for the current tax year. (2)(a) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each year for which an application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(b), or (3) of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by a disabled veteran. (b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each year an application for exemption is approved. The reduction shall equal to the amount of the reduction authorized under division (A)(2)(a) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(a), or (3) of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes under division (A)(2)(b) of this section beginning in one of the following tax years: (i) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(1) of section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the year the disabled veteran dies; (ii) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(2) of section 323.151 of the Revised Code, or the first year on the first day of January of which the total disability rating described in division (F) of that section 323.151 of the Revised Code has been received for the deceased spouse. In either case, the reduction shall continue through the tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. (3) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the surviving spouse of a public service officer killed in the line of duty shall be reduced for each year for which an application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by such a surviving spouse. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes under division (A)(3) of this section for the tax year in which the public service officer dies through the tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. (B)(1) As used in division (B) of this section, "qualifying levy" has the same meaning as in section 319.302 of the Revised Code. (2) To provide a partial exemption, real property taxes on any homestead, and manufactured home taxes on any manufactured or mobile home on which a manufactured home tax is assessed pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code, shall be reduced for each year for which an application for the reduction has been approved. The amount of the reduction shall equal one of the following percentages of the amount of taxes to be levied by qualifying levies on the homestead or the manufactured or mobile home after applying section 319.301 of the Revised Code: (a) For the first tax year to which this amendment applies, 5.70%; (b) For the following tax year, 8.92%; (c) For the second following tax year, 12.15%; (d) For the third following tax year and every year thereafter, 15.38%. (3) A board of county commissioners, by resolution, may authorize a partial exemption from the real property taxes or manufactured home taxes on any property or manufactured or mobile home that receives the partial exemption under division (B)(2) of this section. The resolution shall specify the amount of the partial exemption, which may equal up to two and one-half per cent of the amount of taxes to be levied by qualifying levies on the property or home after applying section 319.301 of the Revised Code. The partial exemption shall be applied concurrently with the partial exemption under division (B)(2) of this section, and no application shall be required under section 323.153 of the Revised Code to obtain the partial exemption authorized pursuant to this section. The board shall certify a copy of the resolution, or a copy of any resolution repealing or modifying the partial exemption's authorization, to the county auditor and tax commissioner within thirty days after its adoption. If the resolution is adopted on or before the first day of July of a tax year, the partial exemption shall first apply or cease to apply, in the case of real property taxes, to that tax year or, in the case of manufactured home taxes, the following tax year. If the resolution is adopted after the first day of July of a tax year, the partial exemption shall first apply or cease to apply, in the case of real property taxes, to the following tax year or, in the case of manufactured home taxes, the second succeeding tax year. (C) The reductions granted by this section do not apply to special assessments or respread of assessments levied against the homestead, and if there is a transfer of ownership subsequent to the filing of an application for a reduction in taxes, such reductions are not forfeited for such year by virtue of such transfer. (D) The reductions in taxable value referred to in this section shall be applied solely as a factor for the purpose of computing the reduction of taxes under this section and shall not affect the total value of property in any subdivision or taxing district as listed and assessed for taxation on the tax lists and duplicates, or any direct or indirect limitations on indebtedness of a subdivision or taxing district. If after application of sections 5705.31 and 5705.32 of the Revised Code, including the allocation of all levies within the ten-mill limitation to debt charges to the extent therein provided, there would be insufficient funds for payment of debt charges not provided for by levies in excess of the ten-mill limitation, the reduction of taxes provided for in sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code shall be proportionately adjusted to the extent necessary to provide such funds from levies within the ten-mill limitation. (E) No reduction shall be made on the taxes due on the homestead of any person convicted of violating division (D) or (E) of section 323.153 of the Revised Code for a period of three years following the conviction. Sec. 4503.064. As used in sections 4503.064 to 4503.069 of the Revised Code: (A) "Sixty-five years of age or older" means a person who will be age sixty-five or older in the calendar year following the year of application for reduction in the assessable value of the person's manufactured or mobile home. (B) "Permanently and totally disabled" means that a person other than a disabled veteran has, on the first day of January of the year of application, including late application, for reduction in the assessable value of a manufactured or mobile home, some impairment in body or mind that makes the person unable to work at any substantially remunerative employment which the person is reasonably able to perform and which will, with reasonable probability, continue for an indefinite period of at least twelve months without any present indication of recovery therefrom or has been certified as permanently and totally disabled by a state or federal agency having the function of so classifying persons. (C) "Homestead exemption" means the reduction in taxes allowed under division (A) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code for the year in which an application is filed under section 4503.066 of the Revised Code. (D) "Manufactured home" has the meaning given in division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code, and includes a structure consisting of two manufactured homes that were purchased either together or separately and are combined to form a single dwelling, but does not include a manufactured home that is taxed as real property pursuant to division (B) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code. (E) "Mobile home" has the meaning given in division (O) of section 4501.01 of the Revised Code and includes a structure consisting of two mobile homes that were purchased together or separately and combined to form a single dwelling, but does not include a mobile home that is taxed as real property pursuant to division (B) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code. (F) "Late application" means an application filed with an original application under division (A)(3) of section 4503.066 of the Revised Code. (G) "Total income," "disabled veteran," "public service officer," and "killed in the line of duty" have the same meanings as in section 323.151 of the Revised Code. (H) "Surviving spouse of a disabled veteran" means either of the following: (1) The spouse of a disabled veteran who occupied the manufactured or mobile home when the disabled veteran died and who acquires ownership of the manufactured or mobile home; (2) The surviving spouse of an individual to which all of the following apply, provided the surviving spouse occupies the manufactured or mobile home when that individual dies and who, following that individual's death, acquires ownership of the manufactured or mobile home: (a) The individual dies before receiving a total disability rating described in division (F) of section 323.151 of the Revised Code. (b) The individual otherwise qualifies as a disabled veteran. (c) The individual owns and occupies a manufactured or mobile home. Sec. 4503.065. (A)(1) Division (A) of this section applies to any of the following persons: (a) An individual who is permanently and totally disabled; (b) An individual who is sixty-five years of age or older; (c) An individual who is the surviving spouse of a deceased person who was permanently and totally disabled or sixty-five years of age or older and who applied and qualified for a reduction in assessable value under this section in the year of death, provided the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine but not sixty-five or more years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies. (2) The manufactured home tax on a manufactured or mobile home that is paid pursuant to division (C) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code and that is owned and occupied as a home by an individual whose domicile is in this state and to whom this section applies, shall be reduced for any tax year for which an application for such reduction has been approved, provided the individual did not acquire ownership from a person, other than the individual's spouse, related by consanguinity or affinity for the purpose of qualifying for the reduction. An owner includes a settlor of a revocable or irrevocable inter vivos trust holding the title to a manufactured or mobile home occupied by the settlor as of right under the trust. (a) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under division (D)(2) of that section, the reduction shall equal one of the following amounts, as applicable to the person: (i) If the person received a reduction under this section for tax year 2007, the greater of the reduction for that tax year or the amount computed under division (A)(2)(b) of this section; (ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a reduction under division (A) of this section for tax year 2014 or under division (A)(1) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code for tax year 2013 or the person is the surviving spouse of such a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount computed under division (A)(2)(b) of this section. (iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(2)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e) of this section, the amount computed under division (A)(2)(b) of this section. (b) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(2)(b) of this section equals the product of the following: (i) Twenty-five thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e) of this section; (ii) The assessment percentage established by the tax commissioner under division (B) of section 5715.01 of the Revised Code, not to exceed thirty-five per cent; (iii) The effective tax rate used to calculate the taxes charged against the property for the current year, where "effective tax rate" is defined as in section 323.08 of the Revised Code; (iv) The quantity equal to one minus the sum of the percentage reductions in taxes received by the property for the current tax year under sections 319.302 and 319.303 of the Revised Code and division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (c) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under division (D)(1) of that section, the reduction shall equal one of the following amounts, as applicable to the person: (i) If the person received a reduction under this section for tax year 2007, the greater of the reduction for that tax year or the amount computed under division (A)(2)(d) of this section; (ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a reduction under division (A) of this section for tax year 2014 or under division (A)(1) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code for tax year 2013 or the person is the surviving spouse of such a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount computed under division (A)(2)(d) of this section. (iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(2)(c)(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e) of this section, the amount computed under division (A)(2)(d) of this section. (d) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(2)(d) of this section equals the product of the following: (i) Twenty-five thousand dollars of the cost to the owner, or the market value at the time of purchase, whichever is greater, as those terms are used in division (D)(1) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code, and as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e) of this section; (ii) The percentage from the appropriate schedule in division (D)(1)(b) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code; (iii) The assessment percentage of forty per cent used in division (D)(1)(b) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code; (iv) The tax rate of the taxing district in which the home has its situs. (e) The tax commissioner shall adjust the income threshold described in divisions (A)(2)(a)(iii) and (A)(2)(c)(iii) and the reduction amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(b)(i), (A)(2)(d)(i), (B)(1), (B)(2), (C)(1), and (C)(2) of this section by completing the following calculations in September of each year: (i) Determine the percentage increase in the gross domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic analysis of the United States department of commerce from the first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last day of December of the preceding calendar year; (ii) Multiply that percentage increase by the total income threshold or reduction amount for the ensuing tax year, as applicable; (iii) Add the resulting product to the total income threshold or reduction amount, as applicable for the ensuing tax year; (iv) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars. The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first day of December each year. The certified amount applies to the second ensuing tax year. The commissioner shall not make the applicable adjustment in any calendar year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be less than the total income threshold or the reduction amount for the ensuing tax year. (B)(1) The manufactured home tax levied pursuant to division (C) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code on a manufactured or mobile home that is owned and occupied by a disabled veteran shall be reduced for any tax year for which an application for such reduction has been approved, provided the disabled veteran did not acquire ownership from a person, other than the disabled veteran's spouse, related by consanguinity or affinity for the purpose of qualifying for the reduction. An owner includes an owner within the meaning of division (A)(2) of this section. (a) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under division (D)(2) of that section, the reduction shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(b)(ii) to (iv) of this section. (b) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under division (D)(1) of that section, the reduction shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of the cost to the owner, or the market value at the time of purchase, whichever is greater, as those terms are used in division (D)(1) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(d)(ii) to (iv) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 4503.0610 of the Revised Code or division (A), (B)(2), or (C) of this section. The reduction applies to only one manufactured or mobile home owned and occupied by a disabled veteran. (2) The manufactured home tax levied pursuant to division (C) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code on a manufactured or mobile home that is owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each tax year for which an application for such reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal the amount of the reduction authorized under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. An owner includes an owner within the meaning of division (A)(2) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 4503.0610 of the Revised Code or division (A), (B)(1), or (C) of this section. The reduction applies to only one manufactured or mobile home owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran. A manufactured or mobile home qualifies for a reduction in taxes under division (B)(2) of this section beginning in one of the following tax years: (a) For a surviving spouse described in division (H)(1) of section 4503.064 of the Revised Code, the year the disabled veteran dies; (b) For a surviving spouse described in division (H)(2) of section 4503.064 of the Revised Code, or the first year on the first day of January of which the total disability rating described in division (F) of section 323.151 of the Revised Code has been received for the deceased spouse. In either case, the reduction shall continue through the tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. (C) The manufactured home tax levied pursuant to division (C) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code on a manufactured or mobile home that is owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a public service officer killed in the line of duty shall be reduced for any tax year for which an application for such reduction has been approved, provided the surviving spouse did not acquire ownership from a person, other than the surviving spouse's deceased public service officer spouse, related by consanguinity or affinity for the purpose of qualifying for the reduction. An owner includes an owner within the meaning of division (A)(2) of this section. (1) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under division (D)(2) of that section, the reduction shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(b)(ii) to (iv) of this section. (2) For manufactured and mobile homes for which the tax imposed by section 4503.06 of the Revised Code is computed under division (D)(1) of that section, the reduction shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of the cost to the owner, or the market value at the time of purchase, whichever is greater, as those terms are used in division (D)(1) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code, as adjusted under division (A)(2)(e) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(2)(d)(ii) to (iv) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 4503.0610 of the Revised Code or division (A) or (B) of this section. The reduction applies to only one manufactured or mobile home owned and occupied by such a surviving spouse. A manufactured or mobile home qualifies for a reduction in taxes under this division for the tax year in which the public service officer dies through the tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. (D) If the owner or the spouse of the owner of a manufactured or mobile home is eligible for a homestead exemption on the land upon which the home is located, the reduction to which the owner or spouse is entitled under this section shall not exceed the difference between the reduction to which the owner or spouse is entitled under division (A), (B), or (C) of this section and the amount of the reduction under the homestead exemption. (E) No reduction shall be made with respect to the home of any person convicted of violating division (C) or (D) of section 4503.066 of the Revised Code for a period of three years following the conviction. Section 2. That existing sections 323.151, 323.152, 4503.064, and 4503.065 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The amendment by this act of sections 323.151 and 323.152 of the Revised Code applies to tax years ending on or after the effective date of this section. The amendment by this act of sections 4503.064 and 4503.065 of the Revised Code applies to tax years beginning on or after the effective date of this section.